src/fst/affixes/verbs.lexc
LEXICON LYGE !!≈ * **@CODE@**
          +V+Inf:lyge    #          ;
          +V+Imp:lyg     #          ;
      +V+Ind+Prs:lyger   #          ;
 +V+Ind+Prs+Pass:lyges   #          ; 
      +V+Ind+Prt:løy     #          ;
       +V+PrfPrc:løyet   #          ;
       +V+PrsPrc:lyg prsptcsuff ;
LEXICON LJUGE !!≈ * **@CODE@**
          +V+Inf:ljuge    #          ;
          +V+Imp:ljug     #          ;
      +V+Ind+Prs:ljuger   #          ;
 +V+Ind+Prs+Pass:ljuges   #          ; 
      +V+Ind+Prt:løy      #          ;
       +V+PrfPrc:løyet    #          ;
       +V+PrsPrc:ljug     prsptcsuff ;
LEXICON LATE !!≈ * **@CODE@**
          +V+Inf:late  # ;
     +V+Inf+Pass:lates # ;
          +V+Imp:lat   # ;
      +V+Ind+Prs:later # ;
 +V+Ind+Prs+Pass:lates # ;
      +V+Ind+Prt:lot   # ;
       +V+PrfPrc:latt  # ;
LEXICON FORNEMME !!≈ * **@CODE@**
            :fornemme v1 ;
  +V+Ind+Prt:fornam   #  ;
LEXICON FRYSE !!≈ * **@CODE@**
            +V+Inf:fryse    # ;
            +V+Imp:frys     # ;
        +V+Ind+Prs:fryser   # ;
   +V+Ind+Prs+Pass:fryses   # ;
 +V+Ind+Prt+Use/NG:frøs     # ;
 +V+Ind+Prt+Use/NG:frøys    # ;
        +V+Ind+Prt:fraus    # ;
  +V+PrfPrc+Use/NG:fryst    # ; ! TV/IV
         +V+PrfPrc:frosset  # ;
         +V+PrsPrc:frysende # ;
LEXICON FYKE !!≈ * **@CODE@**
            +V+Inf:fyke    # ;
            +V+Imp:fyk     # ;
        +V+Ind+Prs:fyker   # ;
   +V+Ind+Prs+Pass:fykes   # ;
 +V+Ind+Prt+Use/NG:føk     # ;
+V+Ind+Prt+Err/Orth:fauk    # ;
        +V+Ind+Prt:føyk    # ;
         +V+PrfPrc:føket   # ;
         +V+PrsPrc:fykende # ;
LEXICON FÅ !!≈ * **@CODE@**
     +V+Inf:få     # ;
     +V+Imp:få     # ;
 +V+Ind+Prs:får    # ;
 +V+Ind+Prt:fikk   # ;
  +V+PrfPrc:fått   # ;
  +V+PrsPrc:fående # ;
LEXICON FØLGE !!≈ * **@CODE@**
          +V+Inf:følge    # ;
          +V+Imp:følg     # ;
      +V+Ind+Prs:følger   # ;
 +V+Ind+Prs+Pass:følges   # ;
      +V+Ind+Prt:fulgte   # ;
       +V+PrfPrc:fulgt    # ;
       +V+PrsPrc:følgende # ;
LEXICON GALE !!≈ * **@CODE@**
            +V+Inf:gale    # ;
            +V+Imp:gal     # ;
        +V+Ind+Prs:galer   # ;
   +V+Ind+Prs+Pass:gales   # ;
        +V+Ind+Prt:gol     # ;
 +V+Ind+Prt+Use/NG:galte   # ;
         +V+PrfPrc:galt    # ;
         +V+PrsPrc:galende # ;
LEXICON GIDDE !!≈ * **@CODE@**
          +V+Inf:gidde    # ;
          +V+Imp:gidd     # ;
      +V+Ind+Prs:gidder   # ;
 +V+Ind+Prs+Pass:giddes   # ;
      +V+Ind+Prt:gadd     # ;
       +V+PrfPrc:giddet   # ;
       +V+PrsPrc:giddende # ;
LEXICON GI !!≈ * **@CODE@**
            +V+Inf:gi      # ;
            +V+Imp:gi      # ;
        +V+Ind+Prs:gir     # ;
   +V+Ind+Prs+Pass:gis     # ;
        +V+Ind+Prt:ga      # ;
 +V+Ind+Prt+Use/NG:gav     # ;
         +V+PrfPrc:gitt    # ;
         +V+PrsPrc:giende  # ;
  +V+PrsPrc+Use/NG:givende # ;
LEXICON GJELDE !!≈ * **@CODE@**
          +V+Inf:gjelde    # ;
          +V+Imp:gjeld     # ;
      +V+Ind+Prs:gjelder   # ;
 +V+Ind+Prs+Pass:gjeldes   # ;
      +V+Ind+Prt:gjaldt    # ;
       +V+PrfPrc:gjeldt    # ;
       +V+PrsPrc:gjeldende # ;
LEXICON GJØRE !!≈ * **@CODE@**
          +V+Inf:gjøre    # ;
          +V+Imp:gjør     # ;
      +V+Ind+Prs:gjør     # ;
 +V+Ind+Prs+Pass:gjøres   # ;
      +V+Ind+Prt:gjorde   # ;
       +V+PrfPrc:gjort    # ;
       +V+PrsPrc:gjørende # ;
LEXICON GLEPPE !!≈ * **@CODE@**
          +V+Inf:gleppe    # ;
          +V+Imp:glepp     # ;
      +V+Ind+Prs:glepper   # ;
 +V+Ind+Prs+Pass:gleppes   # ;
      +V+Ind+Prt:glapp     # ;
       +V+PrfPrc:gluppet   # ;
       +V+PrsPrc:gleppende # ;
LEXICON GLI !!≈ * **@CODE@**
           +V+Inf:gli      # ;
           +V+Imp:gli      # ;
       +V+Ind+Prs:glir     # ;
  +V+Ind+Prs+Pass:glis     # ;
+V+Ind+Prt+Use/NG:gled     # ;
       +V+Ind+Prt:glei     # ;
        +V+PrfPrc:glidd    # ;
        +V+PrsPrc:glidende # ;
LEXICON XIPPE !!≈ * **@CODE@** = glippe, slippe
          +V+Inf:ippe    # ;
          +V+Imp:ipp     # ;
      +V+Ind+Prs:ipper   # ;
 +V+Ind+Prs+Pass:ippes   # ;
      +V+Ind+Prt:app     # ;
       +V+PrfPrc:uppet   # ;
       +V+PrsPrc:ippende # ;
LEXICON GNAGE !!≈ * **@CODE@**
            +V+Inf:gnage    # ;
            +V+Imp:gnag     # ;
        +V+Ind+Prs:gnager   # ;
   +V+Ind+Prs+Pass:gnages   # ;
        +V+Ind+Prt:gnog     # ;
 +V+Ind+Prt+Use/NG:gnagde   # ;
 +V+Ind+Prt+Use/NG:gnaget   # ;
         +V+PrfPrc:gnagd    # ;
  +V+PrfPrc+Use/NG:gnaget   # ;
         +V+PrsPrc:gnagende # ;
LEXICON GNI !!≈ * **@CODE@**
            +V+Inf:gni     # ;
            +V+Imp:gni     # ;
        +V+Ind+Prs:gnir    # ;
   +V+Ind+Prs+Pass:gnies   # ;
 +V+Ind+Prt+Use/NG:gned    # ;
        +V+Ind+Prt:gnei    # ;
         +V+PrfPrc:gnidd   # ;
         +V+PrsPrc:gniende # ;
LEXICON GRAVE !!≈ * **@CODE@**
            +V+Inf:grave    # ;
            +V+Imp:grav     # ;
        +V+Ind+Prs:graver   # ;
   +V+Ind+Prs+Pass:graves   # ;
 +V+Ind+Prt+Use/NG:gravde   # ;
        +V+Ind+Prt:grov     # ;
         +V+PrfPrc:gravd    # ;
  +V+PrfPrc+Use/NG:gravet   # ;
         +V+PrsPrc:gravende # ;
LEXICON GRINE !!≈ * **@CODE@**
            +V+Inf:grine    # ;
            +V+Imp:grin     # ;
        +V+Ind+Prs:griner   # ;
   +V+Ind+Prs+Pass:grines   # ;
        +V+Ind+Prt:grein    # ;
 +V+Ind+Prt+Use/NG:gren     # ;
         +V+PrfPrc:grint    # ;
         +V+PrsPrc:grinende # ;
LEXICON GRIPE !!≈ * **@CODE@**
            +V+Inf:gripe    # ;
            +V+Imp:grip     # ;
        +V+Ind+Prs:griper   # ;
   +V+Ind+Prs+Pass:gripes   # ;
 +V+Ind+Prt+Use/NG:grep     # ;
        +V+Ind+Prt:greip    # ;
         +V+PrfPrc:grepet   # ;
         +V+PrsPrc:gripende # ;
LEXICON GRÅTE !!≈ * **@CODE@**
          +V+Inf:gråte    # ;
          +V+Imp:gråt     # ;
      +V+Ind+Prs:gråter   # ;
 +V+Ind+Prs+Pass:gråtes   # ;
      +V+Ind+Prt:gråt     # ;
       +V+PrfPrc:grått    # ;
       +V+PrsPrc:gråtende # ;
LEXICON GYSE !!≈ * **@CODE@**
            +V+Inf:gyse    # ;
            +V+Imp:gys     # ;
        +V+Ind+Prs:gyser   # ;
   +V+Ind+Prs+Pass:gyses   # ;
        +V+Ind+Prt:gyste   # ;
 +V+Ind+Prt+Use/NG:gjøs    # ;
         +V+PrfPrc:gyst    # ;
         +V+PrsPrc:gysende # ;
LEXICON GYTE !!≈ * **@CODE@**
           +V+Inf:gyte    # ;
           +V+Imp:gyt     # ;
       +V+Ind+Prs:gyter   # ;
  +V+Ind+Prs+Pass:gytes   # ;
+V+Ind+Prt+Use/NG:gjøt    # ;
       +V+Ind+Prt:gytte   # ;
        +V+PrfPrc:gytt    # ;
        +V+PrsPrc:gytende # ;
LEXICON GYVE !!≈ * **@CODE@**
            +V+Inf:gyve    # ;
            +V+Imp:gyv     # ;
        +V+Ind+Prs:gyver   # ;
   +V+Ind+Prs+Pass:gyves   # ;
        +V+Ind+Prt:gjøv    # ;
 +V+Ind+Prt+Use/NG:gøyv    # ;
  +V+PrfPrc+Use/NG:gyvd    # ;
         +V+PrfPrc:gjøvet  # ;
         +V+PrsPrc:gyvende # ;
LEXICON GÅ !!≈ * **@CODE@**
          +V+Inf:gå     # ;
          +V+Imp:gå     # ;
      +V+Ind+Prs:går    # ;
 +V+Ind+Prs+Pass:gås    # ;
      +V+Ind+Prt:gikk   # ;
       +V+PrfPrc:gått   # ;
       +V+PrsPrc:gående # ;
LEXICON HA !!≈ * **@CODE@**
     +V+Inf:ha     # ;
     +V+Imp:ha     # ;
 +V+Ind+Prs:har    # ;
 +V+Ind+Prt:hadde  # ;
  +V+PrfPrc:hatt   # ;
  +V+PrsPrc:haende # ;
LEXICON HENGE !!≈ * **@CODE@**
           +V+Inf:henge    # ;
           +V+Imp:heng     # ;
       +V+Ind+Prs:henger   # ;
  +V+Ind+Prs+Pass:henges   # ;
       +V+Ind+Prt:hang     # ;
 +V+PrfPrc+Use/NG:hunget   # ;
        +V+PrfPrc:hengt    # ;
        +V+PrsPrc:hengende # ;
LEXICON HETE !!≈ * **@CODE@**
            +V+Inf:hete    # ;
            +V+Imp:het     # ;
        +V+Ind+Prs:heter   # ;
   +V+Ind+Prs+Pass:hetes   # ;
        +V+Ind+Prt:het     # ;
 +V+Ind+Prt+Use/NG:hette   # ;
         +V+PrfPrc:hett    # ; 
+V+PrfPrc+Err/Orth:hetet   # ;
         +V+PrsPrc:hetende # ;
