src/fst/stems/verbs.lexc
LEXICON VerbRoot
allmenngjøre:allmenn GJØRE ; !!≈ * @CODE@ 
angi:an GI ; !!≈ * @CODE@ 
angripe:an GRIPE ; !!≈ * @CODE@ 
angå:an GÅ ;
anskueliggjøre:anskuelig GJØRE ;
avgi:av GI ;
avgjøre:av GJØRE ;
avgå:av GÅ ;
avhenge:av HENGE ;
begi:be GI ;
begrave:be GRAVE ;
begripe:be GRIPE ;
begå:be GÅ ;
behenge:be HENGE ;
bekjentgjøre:bekjent GJØRE ;
bevisstgjøre:bevisst GJØRE ;
blautgjøre:blaut GJØRE ;
bløtgjøre:bløt GJØRE ;
borgerliggjøre:borgerlig GJØRE ;
delaktiggjøre:delaktig GJØRE ;
etterfølge:etter FØLGE ;
ettergi:etter GI ;
etterlate:etter LATE ;
ferdiggjøre:ferdig GJØRE ;
folkeliggjøre:folkelig GJØRE ;
foregi:fore GI ;
foregripe:fore GRIPE ;
foregå:fore GÅ ;
forfølge:for FØLGE ;
forgjelde:for GJELDE ;
forgripe:for GRIPE ;
forgå:for GÅ ;
forlate:for LATE ;
fornemme: FORNEMME ;
fragå:fra GÅ ;
framgå:fram GÅ ;
fremgå:frem GÅ ;
fremmedgjøre:fremmed GJØRE ;
frigi:fri GI ; 
frigjøre:fri GJØRE ;
fryse: FRYSE ;
fyke: FYKE ;
få: FÅ ;
følge: FØLGE ;
gale: GALE ;
gi: GI ;
gidde: GIDDE ;
gjelde: GJELDE ;
gjengi:gjen GI ;
gjengjelde:gjen GJELDE ;
gjennomgå:gjennom GÅ ;
gjøre: GJØRE ;
gleppe: GLEPPE ;
gli: GLI ;
glippe:gl XIPPE ;
gnage: GNAGE ;
gni: GNI ;
godgjøre:god GJØRE ;
godtgjøre:godt GJØRE ;
grave: GRAVE ;
grine: GRINE ;
gripe: GRIPE ;
grunngi:grunn GI ;
gråte: GRÅTE ;
gyse: GYSE ;
gyte: GYTE ;
gyve: GYVE ;
gå: GÅ ;
ha: HA ;
henge: HENGE ;
hengi:hen GI ;
hete: HETE ;
imøtegå:imøte GÅ ;
inderliggjøre:inderlig GJØRE ;
inneha:inne HA ;
inngi:inn GI ;
inngå:inn GÅ ;
innlate:inn LATE ;
klargjøre:klar GJØRE ;
kroppsliggjøre:kroppslig GJØRE ;
kunngjøre:kunn GJØRE ;
late: LATE ;
latterliggjøre:latterlig GJØRE ;
legemliggjøre:legemlig GJØRE ;
levendegjøre:levende GJØRE ;
ljuge: LJUGE ;
lyge: LYGE ;
lykksaliggjøre:lykksalig GJØRE ;
løsgjøre:løs GJØRE ;
løslate:løs LATE ;
mangfoldiggjøre:mangfoldig GJØRE ;
medgi:med GI ;
medgå:med GÅ ;
menneskeliggjøre:menneskelig GJØRE ;
muliggjøre:mulig GJØRE ;
namngi:namn GI ;
navngi:navn GI ;
nedlate:ned LATE ;
nyttiggjøre:nyttig GJØRE ;
nødvendiggjøre:nødvendig GJØRE ;
offentliggjøre:offentlig GJØRE ;
omgi:om GI ;
omgjøre:om GJØRE ;
omgå:om GÅ ;
oppfølge:opp FØLGE ;
oppgi:opp GI ; 
opplate:opp LATE ;
overflødiggjøre:overflødig GJØRE ;
overgi:over GI ;
overgå:over GÅ ;
overlate:over LATE ;
personliggjøre:personlig GJØRE ;
prisgi:pris GI ;
pågripe:på GRIPE ;
pågå:på GÅ ;
redegjøre:rede GJØRE ;
reingjøre:rein GJØRE ;
rengjøre:ren GJØRE ;
rettferdiggjøre:rettferdig GJØRE ;
saliggjøre:salig GJØRE ;
sannsynliggjøre:sannsynlig GJØRE ;
sanseliggjøre:sanselig GJØRE ;
selvstendiggjøre:selvstendig GJØRE ;
sjølstendiggjøre:sjølstendig GJØRE ;
slippe:sl XIPPE ;
strigråte:stri GRÅTE ;
sykeliggjøre:sykelig GJØRE ;
synliggjøre:synlig GJØRE ;
tilgi:til GI ;
tilgjengeliggjøre:tilgjengelig GJØRE ;
tilintetgjøre:tilintet GJØRE ;
tilkjennegi:tilkjenne GI ;
tillate:til LATE ;
tjenestegjøre:tjeneste GJØRE ;
tydeliggjøre:tydelig GJØRE ;
udødeliggjøre:udødelig GJØRE ;
ugyldiggjøre:ugyldig GJØRE ;
umuliggjøre:umulig GJØRE ;
umyndiggjøre:umyndig GJØRE ;
undergi:under GI ;
unngå:unn GÅ ;
unnlate:unn LATE ;
unnslippe:unnsl XIPPE ;
uskadeliggjøre:uskadelig GJØRE ;
usynliggjøre:usynlig GJØRE ;
utelate:ute LATE ;
utgi:ut GI ;
utgjøre:ut GJØRE ;
utgå:ut GÅ ;
vanskeliggjøre:vanskelig GJØRE ;
vedgå:ved GÅ ;
vestliggjøre:vestlig GJØRE ;
virkeliggjøre:virkelig GJØRE ;
vitenskapeliggjøre:vitenskapelig GJØRE ;
åndeliggjøre:åndelig GJØRE ;
årelate:åre LATE ;
